Washington statutes.
RCW 18.16.100

Issuance of licenses—Requirements.

(1) Upon completion of an application approved by the department and payment of the proper fee, the director shall issue the appropriate license to any person who:

(a) Is at least seventeen years of age or older;

(b)(i) Has completed and graduated from a school licensed under this chapter in a curriculum approved by the director consisting of the hours of training required under this chapter for a school curriculum, or has met the requirements in RCW 18.16.020 or 18.16.130; or

(ii) Has successfully completed a state-approved apprenticeship program consisting of the hours of training required under this chapter for the apprentice training curriculum; and

(c) Has received a passing grade on the appropriate licensing examination approved or administered by the director.

(2) A person currently licensed under this chapter may qualify for examination and licensure, after the required examination is passed, in another category if he or she has completed the crossover training course.

(3) Upon completion of an application approved by the department, certification of insurance, and payment of the proper fee, the director shall issue a location license to the applicant.

(4) The director may consult with the state board of health and the department of labor and industries in establishing training, apprenticeship, and examination requirements.

[ 2008 c 20 s 5; 2003 c 400 s 5; 2002 c 111 s 7; 1991 c 324 s 6; 1984 c 208 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2003 c 400: See note following RCW 18.16.280.

Effective date—2002 c 111: See note following RCW 18.16.010.